Utah statutes.
63M-7-516.   Waiver of privilege.

(1)  A victim filing a claim under the provisions of this chapter shall be considered to have waived any privilege as to communications or records relevant to an issue of the physical, mental, or emotional conditions of the victim except for the attorney-client privilege.  The waiver shall apply only to reparations officers, the director, the board, and legal counsel.

(2)  The claimant may be required to supply any additional medical or psychological reports available relating to the injury or death for which compensation is claimed.

(3)  The reparations officer hearing a claim or an appeal from a claim shall make available to the claimant a copy of the report.  If the victim is deceased, the director or the director's appointee, on request, shall furnish the claimant a copy of the report unless dissemination of that copy is prohibited by law.

